Utah statutes.
76-10-702.   Fraudulent signing of stock subscriptions.
Every person who signs the name of a fictitious person to any subscription
for, or agreement to take, stock in any corporation existing or proposed, and
every person who signs to any subscription or agreement the name of any
person, knowing that the person has no means or does not intend in good faith
to comply with all the terms thereof, or under any understanding or agreement
that the terms of the subscription or agreement are not to be complied with or
enforced, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
